Arkansas, session 2025, HB1409.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 23, Chapter 18, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:

Subchapter 13 — Electric Reliability Act

23-18-1301. Title.
This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Electric
Reliability Act".

23-18-1302. Legislative findings.
The General Assembly finds that:
(1) Arkansas residents, including families and industries in
this state, depend on reliable and affordable electric utility service for
innumerable things they do, from operating lifesaving medical equipment to
operating lifesaving building temperature and humidity control;
(2) Electric utility service demand must be met with instant
electric utility service supply or interruptions of electric utility service
result;
*ANS044*
02/05/2025 7:49:39 AM ANS044

HB1409
(3) In 2022, two hundred thirty (230) coal plants, that produce
twenty percent (20%) of American electric utility service, were targeted for
closure by activist groups, state and federal regulators, and utility
companies, with dozens of coal plants across the United States slated for
closure in the next three (3) years;
(4) Also in 2022, eighty thousand (80,000) wind towers produced
nine percent (9%) of electric utility service in the United States, and
approximately six thousand (6,000) wind towers are added per year, but at
least seven hundred fifty thousand (750,000) more wind towers are needed to
replace coal and natural gas generation, and sufficient battery storage is
needed to cover the seventy percent (70%) of the time during which wind
towers produce little to no electric utility service;
(5) Solar energy produced less than three percent (3%) of
electricity in the United States in 2022, and only produces electricity
during daylight hours when the sun shines, producing little or no electricity
during daily peak demands of 5:00 p.m. to 9:00 p.m.;
(6) The North American Electric Reliability Corporation, the
regional transmission organizations, Midcontinent Independent System
Operator, and Pennsylvania-New Jersey-Maryland Interconnection have warned
that large swathes of the United States face elevated risks of electric
utility service shortfalls now and in the future;
(7) Restricting the supply of electric utility service without
immediate substitutes jeopardizes reliability and affordability and will
cause interruptions of electric utility service, often when needed most,
during the hottest and coldest months;
(8) Electric utility service in the United States has remained
static for the last twenty (20) years, yet investments in new electric power
generation have accelerated;
(9) Rising electric utility service prices and decreased
reliability will contribute to overall inflation;
(10) America's coal and natural gas plants should not be
recklessly decommissioned or regulated out of existence. Instead, they
should be kept online and readily available to provide flexibility for
national security in times of war, economic security, supply security, price
stability, and reliability;
(11) Winter storms have caused millions to lose electric utility
02/05/2025 7:49:39 AM ANS044

HB1409
service for extended periods, costing lives and billions of dollars in
damages because of electric utility service shortages and outages;
(12) The affordability and reliability of electric service is of
major importance to low-income Arkansans because they spend the largest
percentage of their income on energy and are harmed the most by high energy
prices; and
(13) Arkansas will use all means necessary to protect this
state's electric utility service reliability because regulation of electric
utility service and pollutants are not among the constitutionally delegated
powers assigned to the United States Government and are reserved to the state
under the Tenth Amendment to the United States Constitution.

23-18-1303. Reliability and availability of electric generation
facilities — Definitions.
(a) As used in this section:
(1)(A) "Dispatchable" means a source of electric utility service
that:
(i) Is readily available for use on demand and can
be dispatched upon request of a power grid operator; or
(ii) Can have its power output adjusted according to
market needs, except for routine maintenance or repairs.
(B) "Dispatchable" includes on-demand power;
(2) "Electric generation facility" means a facility that uses
hydroelectric, coal, natural gas, or nuclear fuel to generate reliable or
dispatchable electric utility service to a retail customer for compensation;
(3)(A) "Firm power" means dispatchable, reliable power
generation and battery storage of more than twenty-four (24) hours.
(B) "Firm power" does not include power that is not
dispatchable; and
(4) "Reliable" means a source of electric utility service that:
(A) Is not subject to intermittent availability;
(B) Has a performance standard of eighty percent (80%) or
higher; and
(C) Has a performance standard that only falls below
eighty percent (80%) during routine maintenance or repairs.
(b)(1) The Arkansas Public Service Commission shall not authorize or
02/05/2025 7:49:39 AM ANS044

HB1409
approve the retirement of an electric generation facility as proposed in a
rate case, integrated resource plan, or other submission to the commission
until there is an equal or greater contracted new means of firm power
available on the electric grid to replace the loss of firm power brought
about by the proposed closure of the electric generation facility.
(2) An equal or greater contracted new means of firm power under
subdivision (b)(1) of this section shall not be from any future prospects.
(c)(1) In assessing the amount of replacement firm power needed under
subdivision (b)(1) of this section, the commission shall consider imminent
and planned closures of electric generation facilities in other states of the
member regional transmission organizations in addition to the imminent and
planned closures in this state.
(2) If other states of the member regional transmission
organizations are not replacing their retired or closed electric generation
facilities or other means of firm power that are scheduled for retirement
with an equal or greater amount of firm power, the commission shall include
the lack of replacements to the calculations of this state's replacement of
firm power under subdivision (b)(1) of this section before approving the
proposed closure of an electric generation facility.
(d)(1) If the United States Government through regulation forces
costly upgrades or other requirements leading to the closure of existing
electric generation facilities, the commission shall seek a waiver from the
federal government until there is sufficient replacement firm power available
to the electric grid to replace the retired electric generation facility.
(2) If a waiver is requested under subdivision (d)(1) of this
section but is not granted, the commission shall seek a court injunction and
bring litigation against the implementation of the closure of an electric
generation facility.








02/05/2025 7:49:39 AM ANS044